Nevada, session 83, AB216.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 171 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Each law enforcement agency shall prescribe a written or
electronic form on which the results of a lethality assessment
conducted pursuant to NRS 171.1225 must be reported.
2. If a lethality assessment conducted pursuant to NRS
171.1225 indicates that the person assessed is in a potentially
high-risk lethal situation, the peace officer shall:
(a) Advise the person that he or she is in a potentially high-risk
lethal situation;
(b) Provide the person with a domestic violence card that
contains information about appropriate counseling or other
supportive services available in the community in which the
person resides; and
(c) Refer the person to a victim’s advocate who primarily
provides services to victims of domestic violence.
3. If a person does not or is unable to provide information to
a peace officer sufficient to allow the peace officer to complete the
lethality assessment form or refuses to accept a domestic violence
card provided pursuant to subsection 2, the peace officer shall
document this information on the lethality assessment form.
4. As used in this section, “victim’s advocate” means a person
who has completed relevant training and who, with or without
compensation, works for:
(a) A program of a university, state college or community
college within the Nevada System of Higher Education which
provides assistance to victims;
-
*AB216_R1*

– 3 –
(b) A program of a tribal organization which provides
assistance to victims;
(c) An organization which provides assistance to victims; or
(d) A nonprofit organization which provides assistance to
victims.
Sec. 2. NRS 171.1225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
171.1225 1. When investigating an act of domestic violence,
a peace officer shall:
(a) Make a good faith effort to explain the provisions of NRS
171.137 pertaining to domestic violence and advise victims of all
reasonable means to prevent further abuse, including advising each
person of the availability of a shelter or other services in the
community.
(b) Provide a person suspected of being the victim of an act of
domestic violence with a written copy of the following statements:
(1) My name is Officer ......................... (naming the
investigating officer). Nevada law requires me to inform you of the
following information.
(2) If I have probable cause to believe that a battery has been
committed against you, your minor child or the minor child of the
person believed to have committed the battery in the last 24 hours
by your spouse, your former spouse, any other person to whom you
are related by blood or marriage, a person with whom you have had
or are having a dating relationship or a person with whom you have
a child in common, and if I had a face-to-face encounter with the
person suspected of committing the battery that was of sufficient
duration to determine whether probable cause existed while
responding to the initial incident or call for service, I am required,
unless mitigating circumstances exist, to arrest the person suspected
of committing the battery.
(3) If I have probable cause to believe that a battery has been
committed against you, your minor child or the minor child of the
person believed to have committed the battery in the last 7 days by
your spouse, your former spouse, any other person to whom you are
related by blood or marriage, a person with whom you have had or
are having a dating relationship or a person with whom you have a
child in common, and if I did not have a face-to-face encounter with
the person suspected of committing the battery that was of sufficient
duration to determine whether probable cause existed while
responding to the initial incident or call for service, I am required,
unless mitigating circumstances exist, to arrest the person suspected
of committing the battery.
(4) If I am unable to arrest the person suspected of
committing the battery, you have the right to request that the
prosecutor file a criminal complaint against the person. I can
-
*AB216_R1*

– 4 –
provide you with information on this procedure. If convicted, the
person who committed the battery may be placed on probation,
ordered to see a counselor, put in jail or fined.
(5) The law provides that you may seek a court order for the
protection of you, your minor children or any animal that is owned
or kept by you, by the person who committed or threatened the act
of domestic violence or by the minor child of either such person
against further threats or acts of domestic violence. You do not need
to hire a lawyer to obtain such an order for protection.
(6) An order for protection may require the person who
committed or threatened the act of domestic violence against you to:
(I) Stop threatening, harassing or injuring you or your
children;
(II) Move out of your residence;
(III) Stay away from your place of employment;
(IV) Stay away from the school attended by your
children;
(V) Stay away from any place you or your children
regularly go;
(VI) Avoid or limit all communication with you or your
children;
(VII) Stop physically injuring, threatening to injure or
taking possession of any animal that is owned or kept by you or
your children, either directly or through an agent; and
(VIII) Stop physically injuring or threatening to injure
any animal that is owned or kept by the person who committed or
threatened the act or his or her children, either directly or through an
agent.
(7) A court may make future orders for protection which
award you custody of your children and require the person who
committed or threatened the act of domestic violence against you to:
(I) Pay the rent or mortgage due on the place in which
you live;
(II) Pay the amount of money necessary for the support of
your children;
(III) Pay part or all of the costs incurred by you in
obtaining the order for protection; and
(IV) Comply with the arrangements specified for the
possession and care of any animal owned or kept by you or your
children or by the person who committed or threatened the act or his
or her children.
(8) To get an order for protection, go to room number .......
(state the room number of the office at the court) at the court, which
is located at ......................... (state the address of the court). Ask the
-
*AB216_R1*

– 5 –
clerk of the court to provide you with the forms for an order of
protection.
(9) If the person who committed or threatened the act of
domestic violence against you violates the terms of an order for
protection, the person may be arrested and, if:
(I) The arresting officer determines that such a violation
is accompanied by a direct or indirect threat of harm;
(II) The person has previously violated a temporary or
extended order for protection; or
(III) At the time of the violation or within 2 hours after
the violation, the person has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or
more in the person’s blood or breath or an amount of a prohibited
substance in the person’s blood or urine, as applicable, that is equal
to or greater than the amount set forth in subsection 3 or 4 of
NRS 484C.110,
 the person will not be admitted to bail sooner than 12 hours after
arrest.
(10) You may obtain emergency assistance or shelter by
contacting your local program against domestic violence at
......................... (state name, address and telephone number of local
program) or you may call, without charge to you, the Statewide
Program Against Domestic Violence at ........................ (state toll-
free telephone number of Statewide Program).
(c) Complete a lethality assessment form for a person
suspected of being the victim of domestic violence if the peace
officer has probable cause to believe that the person believed to
have committed the act of domestic violence is:
(1) His or her spouse or former spouse;
(2) A person with whom he or she had or is having a dating
relationship; or
(3) A person with whom he or she has a child in common.
2. The failure of a peace officer to carry out the requirements
set forth in subsection 1 is not a defense in a criminal prosecution
for the commission of an act of domestic violence, nor may such an
omission be considered as negligence or as causation in any civil
action against the peace officer or the officer’s employer.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Act of domestic violence” means any of the following acts
committed by a person against his or her spouse, former spouse, any
other person to whom he or she is related by blood or marriage, a
person with whom he or she has had or is having a dating
relationship, a person with whom he or she has a child in common,
the minor child of any of those persons or his or her minor child:
(1) A battery.
(2) An assault.
-
*AB216_R1*

– 6 –
(3) Compelling the other by force or threat of force to
perform an act from which he or she has the right to refrain or to
refrain from an act which he or she has the right to perform.
(4) A sexual assault.
(5) A knowing, purposeful or reckless course of conduct
intended to harass the other. Such conduct may include, but is not
limited to:
(I) Stalking.
(II) Arson.
(III) Trespassing.
(IV) Larceny.
(V) Destruction of private property.
(VI) Carrying a concealed weapon without a permit.
(VII) Injuring or killing an animal.
(6) False imprisonment.
(7) Unlawful entry of the other’s residence, or forcible entry
against the other’s will if there is a reasonably foreseeable risk of
harm to the other from the entry.
(b) “Dating relationship” means frequent, intimate associations
primarily characterized by the expectation of affectional or sexual
involvement. The term does not include a casual relationship or an
ordinary association between persons in a business or social context.
(c) “Lethality assessment form” means a written or electronic
form prescribed by a law enforcement agency pursuant to section
1 of this act.
Sec. 3. NRS 171.1227 is hereby amended to read as follows:
171.1227 1. If a peace officer investigates an act that
constitutes domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018, the peace
officer shall prepare and submit a written report of the investigation
to the peace officer’s supervisor or to another person designated by
the peace officer’s supervisor, regardless of whether the peace
officer makes an arrest.
2. If the peace officer investigates a mutual battery that
constitutes domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018 and finds that
one of the persons involved was the primary physical aggressor, the
peace officer shall include in the report:
(a) The name of the person who was the primary physical
aggressor; and
(b) A description of the evidence which supports the peace
officer’s finding.
3. If the peace officer investigates an act that constitutes
domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018, the peace officer shall
submit the results of any lethality assessment conducted pursuant
to NRS 171.1225 to the district attorney of the jurisdiction in
which the act occurred.
-
*AB216_R1*

– 7 –
4. If the peace officer does not make an arrest, the peace officer
shall include in the report the reason the peace officer did not do so.
[4.] 5. The information contained in a report made pursuant to
subsections 1 and 2 must be:
(a) Aggregated each month; and
(b) Forwarded by each jurisdiction to the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History not later than the 15th day of
the following month.
[5.] 6. The Director of the Department of Public Safety shall
prescribe the form on which the information described in subsection
[4] 5 must be reported to the Central Repository. In addition to the
information required pursuant to subsections 1 and 2, the form must
also require the inclusion of the following information from each
report:
(a) The gender, age and race of the persons involved;
(b) The relationship of the persons involved;
(c) The date and time of day of the offense;
(d) The number of children present, if any, at the time of the
offense;
(e) Whether or not an order for protection against domestic
violence was in effect at the time of the offense;
(f) Whether or not any weapons were used during the
commission of the offense;
(g) Whether or not any person required medical attention;
(h) Whether or not any person was given a domestic violence
card that contains information about appropriate counseling or other
supportive services available in the community in which that person
resides;
(i) Whether or not the primary physical aggressor, if identified,
was arrested and, if not, any mitigating circumstances explaining
why an arrest was not made; and
(j) Whether or not any other person was arrested.
Sec. 4. NRS 178.4853 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.4853 In reviewing the custody status of a person, the court
at a minimum shall consider the following factors concerning the
person:
1. The length of residence in the community;
2. The status and history of employment;
3. Relationships with the person’s spouse and children, parents
or other family members and with close friends;
4. Reputation, character and mental condition;
5. Prior criminal record, including, without limitation, any
record of appearing or failing to appear after release on bail or
without bail;
-
*AB216_R1*

– 8 –
6. The identity of responsible members of the community who
would vouch for the reliability of the person;
7. The nature of the offense with which the person is charged,
the apparent probability of conviction and the likely sentence,
insofar as these factors relate to the risk of not appearing;
8. The nature and seriousness of the danger to the alleged
victim, any other person or the community that would be posed by
the person’s release [;] , the consideration of which may include a
review of the results of a lethality assessment conducted pursuant
to NRS 171.1225;
9. The likelihood of more criminal activity by the person after
release; and
10. Any other factors concerning the person’s ties to the
community or bearing on the risk that the person may willfully fail
to appear.
Sec. 5. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval
for the purposes of adopting any regulations and performing any
other preparatory administrative tasks that are necessary to carry out
the provisions of this act and on October 1, 2025, for all other
purposes.
H
-
*AB216_R1*